Illinois, session 104th, HB5580.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-4-3b as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-4-3b)7    Sec. 5-4-3b. Electronic Laboratory Information Management 8System. 9    (a) The Illinois State Police shall obtain, implement, and 10maintain an Electronic Laboratory Information Management 11System (LIMS) to efficiently and effectively track all 12evidence submitted for forensic testing. At a minimum, the 13LIMS shall record:14        (1) the criminal offense or suspected criminal offense 15    for which the evidence is being submitted;16        (2) the law enforcement agency submitting the 17    evidence;18        (3) the name of the victim;19        (4) the law enforcement agency case number;20        (5) the Illinois State Police Laboratory case number;21        (6) the date the evidence was received by the Illinois 22    State Police Laboratory;23        (7) if the Illinois State Police Laboratory sent the   HB5580 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17998 RLC 31435 b1    evidence for analysis to another designated laboratory, 2    the name of the laboratory and the date the evidence was 3    sent to that laboratory; and4        (8) the date and description of any results or 5    information regarding the analysis sent to the submitting 6    law enforcement agency by the Illinois State Police 7    Laboratory or any other designated laboratory.8    The LIMS shall also link multiple forensic evidence 9submissions pertaining to a single criminal investigation such 10that evidence submitted to confirm a previously reported 11Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) hit in a State or federal 12database can be linked to the initial evidence submission. The 13LIMS shall be such that the system provides ease of 14interoperability with law enforcement agencies for evidence 15submission and reporting, as well as supports expansion 16capabilities for future internal networking and laboratory 17operations.18    (b) The Illinois State Police, in consultation with and 19subject to the approval of the Chief Procurement Officer, may 20procure a single contract or multiple contracts to implement 21the provisions of this Section. A contract or contracts under 22this subsection are not subject to the provisions of the 23Illinois Procurement Code, except for Sections 20-60, 20-65, 2420-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of that Code, provided that 25the Chief Procurement Officer may, in writing with 26justification, waive any certification required under Article   HB5580 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17998 RLC 31435 b150 of the Illinois Procurement Code. This exemption is 2inoperative 2 years from January 1, 2016 (the effective date 3of Public Act 99-352).4    (c) If a consistent DNA profile has been identified by 5comparing evidence with a known standard from a suspect or 6with DNA profiles in the CODIS database, the Illinois State 7Police shall utilize the Electronic Laboratory Information 8Management System to notify the investigating law enforcement 9agency of the results in writing, and the Illinois State 10Police shall provide an automatic courtesy copy of the written 11notification to the appropriate State's Attorney's Office for 12tracking and further action, as necessary. 13(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)